Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 9 Temporary Assistance for Needy Families

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the enactment of this article, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 284 (1997).

For article, “Child Welfare and Future Persons,” see 43 Ga. L. Rev. 367 (2009).

49-4-180.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-180

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6.

49-4-181.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Applicant” means a person who applies for assistance under the state plan.

“Assistance” means the temporary assistance provided to needy families with children in accordance with Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, regulations promulgated pursuant thereto by the secretary of health and human services, all applicable laws of this state, the state plan, and regulations of the Board of Human Services.

“Board” means the Board of Human Services.

“Cash assistance” means the money payment component of TANF assistance.

“Department” means the Department of Human Services.

“Family” means one or more children living with a responsible parent, both parents, or other caretaker relative or legal guardian.

“Recipient” means a person who receives assistance pursuant to the state plan.

“State plan” means the plan submitted by the State of Georgia to the secretary of health and human services, pursuant to Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, particularly by the Act of August 22, 1996, Public Law 104-193, the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, as amended.

“TANF” means temporary assistance for needy families.

“Work activity” means a work activity as defined by Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended. The term currently includes any of the following:

Unsubsidized employment;

Subsidized private sector employment;

Subsidized public sector employment;

Work experience, including work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted housing, if sufficient private sector employment is not available;

On-the-job training;

Job search and job readiness assistance, but such activity by a recipient shall be limited to no more than six weeks, only four weeks of which may be consecutive, unless the state’s unemployment rate is 50 percent above the national average, in which case such activity shall be limited to no more than 12 weeks, only four weeks of which may be consecutive;

Community service programs;

Vocational educational training, not to exceed 12 months with respect to any individual;

Job skills training directly related to employment;

Education directly related to employment, in the case of a recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a certificate of high school equivalency;

Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of study leading to a certificate of general equivalence, in the case of a recipient who has not completed secondary school or received such a certificate of high school equivalency; and

The provision of child care services to an individual who is participating in a community service program.

In the event the definition of work activities in Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act is amended to delete from or add to the list of activities contained in this paragraph, any such change or changes shall be incorporated into this paragraph. The minimum average number of hours per week of such work activity for not less than the percentage of recipients comprising the minimum work participation rate in a given federal fiscal year shall be as follows:

Click to view

“Work participation rate” means the percentage of TANF recipients who are required to engage in a work activity in accordance with Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended. The minimum work participation rate with respect to all families receiving assistance under the Georgia TANF Program shall be, in accordance with current federal law, as follows:

Click to view

The minimum work participation rate with respect to two-parent families receiving assistance under the Georgia TANF Program shall be, in accordance with current federal law, as follows:

Click to view

Provided, however, that the work participation rates reflected in this paragraph may be adjusted due to caseload reductions in accordance with Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended.

The minimum average If the month is in number of hours per federal fiscal year week is: 1997 20 1998 20 1999 25 2000 or thereafter 30

The minimum If the federal participation fiscal year is: rate is: 1997 25% 1998 30% 1999 35% 2000 40% 2002 or thereafter 50%

The minimum If the federal participation fiscal year is: rate is: 1997 75% 1998 75% 1999 or thereafter 90%

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-181

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 49; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 2-2, 2-3/HB 228.

U.S. Code.

Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 601

et seq.

49-4-182.
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program created.

There is created the Georgia Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program, which shall be known as the “Georgia TANF Program.” The purpose of such program is to provide necessary assistance to needy families with children on a temporary basis and to provide parents, legal guardians, or other caretaker relatives of children with the necessary support services to enable such parents, legal guardians, or caretaker relatives to become self-sufficient and leave the program as soon as possible. After an initial assessment and once the state determines an applicant is ready for work, applicants for assistance shall be required to engage in a work activity in accordance with Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and the state plan as soon as possible after making application for assistance, but in any event no later than 24 months after first receiving cash assistance.

Assistance shall be provided in accordance with the state plan and any future amendments thereto. Cash assistance to a recipient who is not a minor child and who is a head of a household or married to the head of a household shall be limited to a lifetime maximum of 48 months, whether or not consecutive, beginning January 1, 1997.

Nothing in this article, the state plan, or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this article shall be interpreted to entitle any individual or any family to assistance under the Georgia TANF Program.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-182

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6.

U.S. Code.

Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 601

et seq.

49-4-183.
Administration of article by department; promulgation of rules and regulations by board; duties of department.

This article shall be administered by the Department of Human Services. The Board of Human Services shall issue such rules and regulations as may be necessary to administer this article properly and to comply with the requirements of Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, the state plan, and any future amendments to such Act or plan. The initial rules and regulations for the Georgia TANF Program shall be promulgated by the board pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and specifically Code Section 50-13-4 no later than July 1, 1997.

The board shall ensure that such rules and regulations provide for:

Methods of administration necessary for the proper and efficient operation of the state plan for implementation of this article;

Reasonable standards for determining eligibility and the extent of assistance available for recipients;

Consideration of the income and resources of an applicant for assistance in determining eligibility;

Personal responsibility obligations and work activity requirements consistent with Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and the state plan, provided that programs included in the personal responsibility obligations established by the board shall include counseling on abstinence until marriage;

Criteria which make an applicant ineligible to receive benefits under the Georgia TANF Program, including but not limited to those specified in Code Section 49-4-184;

Specific conduct which would authorize the reduction or termination of assistance to a recipient, including but not limited to that specified in Code Section 49-4-185;

Standards whereby certain obligations, requirements, and criteria will be waived for specific applicants or recipients based on hardship;

An administrative hearing process with hearings to be conducted by the Office of State Administrative Hearings in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and subsection (b) of Code Section 49-4-13;

Safeguards which restrict the use and disclosure of information concerning applicants for and recipients of assistance under this article and in accordance with Code Section 49-4-14 and Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended;

Immunizations for specified diseases for preschool age children as a condition of assistance being provided for such children, and the schedule of and standards for administering such immunizations, including the presentation of a certificate of immunization, unless:

There is appropriate evidence from the local health department or a physician that an immunization sequence has been started and can be completed within a period of up to 180 days, in which case a waiver of the immunization requirement for up to 180 days shall be granted;

After examination by the local board of health or a physician, any preschool age child is found to have a physical disability which may make vaccination undesirable, in which case a certificate to that effect issued by the local board of health or the physician may be accepted in lieu of a certificate of immunization and shall exempt the child from obtaining a certificate of immunization until the disability is relieved;

The parent or legal guardian furnishes an affidavit swearing or affirming that the immunization conflicts with the religious beliefs of the parent or legal guardian; or

The implementation of such an immunization requirement violates any federal law or regulations or would result in the loss of any federal funds to this state; and

The establishment and maintenance of individual development accounts. The funds in such accounts may be used for postsecondary educational expenses, the purchase of a first home, or business capitalization. The funds in such accounts shall not be considered in determining eligibility for cash assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 604(h).

The department shall:

Supervise the administration of assistance pursuant to the Georgia TANF Program by the division of family and children services;

Prescribe necessary forms and procedures to carry out the Georgia TANF Program, subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the board pursuant to this article;

Publish in print or electronically an annual report and such interim reports as may be necessary. The annual report and such interim reports shall be provided to the Governor and members of the General Assembly. The department shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report or the interim reports to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the reports in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient. The annual report and interim reports shall contain the following:

The total TANF caseload count;

Quarterly and annual TANF reports, in full, prepared for submission to the federal government;

The percentage of the TANF caseload and the number of individuals given a hardship exemption from the lifetime limit on cash assistance and a categorization of the reasons for such exemptions;

The number of individuals who received transportation assistance and the cost of such assistance;

The number of individuals who received diversionary assistance in order to prevent their requiring TANF assistance and the categories and cost of such diversionary assistance, and job acceptance and retention statistics;

The number of individuals denied assistance due to a serious violent felony conviction;

The number of mothers under 19 years of age who received assistance and their percentage of the total TANF caseload;

The number of children receiving subsidized child care and the total and average per recipient cost of child care provided to TANF recipients;

Data on teen pregnancy prevention;

The number of families sanctioned;

The number of legal immigrants receiving TANF benefits by category of immigration status;

The number of families no longer eligible because of time limits;

Follow-up information on job retention and earnings; and

An evaluation of the effect of Code Section 49-4-186 on the number of births to TANF recipient families.

The information required under this paragraph shall be provided on a county-by-county basis where feasible; and

Develop a plan, on or before January 1, 1998, to provide incentives for employers to hire those TANF recipients who have difficulty in finding employment.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-183

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 49; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 39/SB 49; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 2-2, 2-3/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

U.S. Code.

Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 601

et seq.

49-4-184.
Eligibility for assistance.

An applicant is not eligible for assistance under this article and a recipient shall no longer be eligible for assistance under this article if:

The applicant’s or recipient’s family does not include a minor child;

The applicant or recipient does not cooperate with the department in establishing paternity, in providing assistance in a fraud and abuse investigation, or in establishing, modifying, or enforcing a support order with respect to a child of the applicant or recipient, and the applicant or recipient does not qualify for any good cause exception which may be established by the board;

The applicant or recipient fails to assign to the department any rights that applicant or recipient may have to support from any other person, not exceeding the total amount of assistance so provided to the family which accrues or has accrued before the date the recipient family leaves the program, in accordance with the provisions of Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended;

The applicant or recipient is convicted of a serious violent felony as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 17-10-6.1 on or after January 1, 1997;

The applicant or recipient is convicted of any felony under Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 16, the “Georgia Controlled Substances Act,” on or after January 1, 1997;

The applicant or recipient is under 18 years of age, is not married, has a minor child at least 12 weeks of age in his or her care, and has not completed a high school education or its equivalent, unless the applicant or recipient participates and obtains passing grades in:

Educational activities directed toward the attainment of a high school diploma or its equivalent; or

An alternative educational or training program that has been approved by the department;

The applicant or recipient is under 18 years of age, has never married, and is either pregnant or has a minor child in his or her care, unless:

The applicant or recipient and the child or children live in a place of residence maintained by the applicant’s or recipient’s parent, legal guardian, or other adult relative of the applicant or recipient as such parent’s, legal guardian’s, or other adult relative’s own home; or

The applicant or recipient lives in a foster home, maternity home, or other supportive living arrangement supervised by an adult;

The applicant or recipient is fleeing to avoid prosecution or custody or confinement after conviction of a felony under the laws of the place from which the applicant or recipient is a fugitive;

The applicant or recipient violates a condition of probation or parole imposed under state or federal law; or

The recipient is pregnant and fails to participate actively in prenatal care arranged by the department at a level defined by the department.

Paragraphs (6) and (7) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply if the applicant or recipient has no parent or legal guardian whose whereabouts are known, no parent or legal guardian of the applicant or recipient allows the applicant or recipient to live in the home of that parent or legal guardian, or the department otherwise determines that there is good cause not to apply the prohibitions contained in said paragraphs.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-184

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 49.

U.S. Code.

Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in paragraph (a)(3) of this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 601

et seq.

49-4-185.
Sanctions against recipient for failure to comply.

As used in this Code section, the term “sanction” means a 25 percent reduction of any cash assistance provided to a family for a time period established by the board for the first material violation and termination of any cash assistance provided to the family for any subsequent material violation within a time period established by the board; provided, however, that the department determine that there is good cause not to apply such a sanction in specific circumstances.

A recipient shall be subject to sanction for failing to comply with the state plan if the recipient:

Fails to report that a child is absent from home for a period of 45 consecutive days or, in the case of a child who is a recipient, being absent from home for a period of 45 consecutive days; provided, however, that a child who is a recipient shall not be sanctioned if the department determines there is good cause not to sanction the child under such circumstances;

Violates any personal responsibility or work participation requirement; provided, however, that a single custodial parent with a child under 12 months of age may be exempt from any work participation requirement until adequate child care is available; or

Except for violations of subsection (a) of Code Section 49-4-184 which result in the recipient no longer being eligible for assistance, violates any other term or condition specified in the federal Social Security Act, as amended, the state plan, or the rules and regulations of the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-185

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 8.

U.S. Code.

The federal Social Security Act, referred to in paragraph (b)(3) of this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 301

et seq.

49-4-186.
Schedule of assistance to eliminate increment in benefits under TANF program as result of child birth during eligibility period.

The schedule of assistance to be paid to a recipient family under this article shall eliminate the increment in benefits under the Georgia TANF Program as a result of the birth of a child during the period in which the family is eligible for TANF assistance or during a temporary period in which the family or recipient is ineligible for TANF assistance pursuant to a sanction imposed for failure to comply with eligibility requirements, subsequent to which the family or recipient is again eligible for assistance. The recipient family in which the recipient parent gives birth to an additional child during the recipient’s period of eligibility for TANF assistance, or during a temporary period of ineligibility for assistance, may not receive additional assistance, except in the case of a general increase in the amount of TANF assistance which is provided to all program recipients. This provision shall only apply to recipient families who have been in receipt of cash assistance under this article for a total of ten months after May 1, 1997. Nothing in this Code section shall be considered to disqualify a recipient family from an incremental increase in assistance in cases in which the birth of a child is the result of a verifiable rape or incest.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-186

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6.

49-4-187.
Assistance for applicants moving into state after receiving assistance from another state.

An applicant who moves into this state after receiving assistance from another state under Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, if otherwise eligible to receive assistance under the Georgia TANF Program, shall receive the same level of assistance for the same period of time under the same requirements and restrictions as a resident of this state; provided, however, that for a period not to exceed 12 months, such applicant shall receive the same amount of cash assistance as that applicant received in his or her previous state of residence, if such amount is lower than the amount of cash assistance paid to a comparable family unit in this state; provided, further, that an applicant who moves into this state shall be eligible to receive cash assistance for the same time period for which he or she would have been eligible in his or her previous state of residence, if such time period is shorter than the maximum time period permitted for receipt of assistance in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-187

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6.

U.S. Code.

Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 601

et seq.

49-4-188.
Assistance for qualified aliens.

As used in this Code section, the term “qualified alien” means a qualified alien as defined in Section 431 of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, as amended, Public Law 104-193.

Qualified aliens will be eligible for assistance under the Georgia TANF Program upon meeting the same qualifications and conditions as other applicants.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-188

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 850, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 845, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 790, § 1.

U.S. Code.

Section 431 of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section, is codified at

8 U.S.C. § 1641

.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to social services, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 232 (1998).

49-4-189.
[Reserved].

Reserved.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was reserved by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6, effective April 22, 1997.

49-4-190.
Construction of article.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that this article be construed consistently with Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and so as to authorize the Department of Human Services, within the appropriations provided to it, to administer the state plan in a manner so as to receive the maximum amount of the federal block grant available for expenditures made under the state plan. Nothing in this article shall be construed to impose requirements which conflict with such federal law or regulations promulgated thereunder so as to result in a loss of federal funding to this state under that law.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-190

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

U.S. Code.

Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 601

et seq.

49-4-191.
Establishment and enforcement of standards and procedures by department.

The department shall establish and enforce standards and procedures to:

Screen and identify recipients of TANF assistance with a history of being victims of domestic violence, while protecting the confidentiality of any such recipients;

Refer any such recipients to counseling and supportive services; and

Waive, pursuant to a determination of good cause, other program requirements for any such recipients of TANF assistance, such as time limits, for so long as necessary, residency requirements, child support cooperation requirements, and family cap provisions, in cases where compliance with such requirements would make it more difficult for individuals receiving TANF assistance to escape domestic violence or unfairly penalize such recipients who are or have been victimized by such violence, or individuals who are at risk of further domestic violence.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-191

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 6.

49-4-192.
Establishment of pilot LEARNFARE program.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Program” means the LEARNFARE program established in this Code section.

“Teen-ager” means a person at least 13 years of age but not more than 16 years of age who is included in a grant of TANF assistance, who is residing with a parent or guardian, and who has not graduated from high school or received a certificate of high school equivalency (GED).

The purpose of this Code section is to establish a pilot LEARNFARE program that requires school attendance of all teen-agers.

The department shall establish in not less than ten counties in this state a pilot LEARNFARE program. Such program shall require school attendance of all teen-agers.

A teen-ager who is required to attend school to meet LEARNFARE participation requirements under this Code section shall comply except when there is good cause shown, as defined by the department.

Upon determination that a teen-ager has failed without good cause to attend school as required, the teen-ager will be removed from the TANF grant for the next possible payment month.

A sanction applied under this program shall be effective for one month for each month that the teen-ager failed to meet the monthly attendance requirement, as established by the department. In the case of a teen-ager who drops out of school, the sanction shall remain in force until the teen-ager provides written proof from the school system that the teen-ager has re-enrolled and has met the monthly attendance requirement for one calendar month.

The department shall adopt not later than July 1, 1997, such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement this program. The department shall establish by appropriate rules and regulations the eligibility and participation guidelines for such program.

The department shall further provide, no later than January 1, 1999, a written report to the General Assembly which shall describe all actions taken to implement this program and the results and findings derived therefrom.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-192

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 7.1.

49-4-193.
Drug test required for certain TANF applicants or recipients; ineligibility for benefits based upon positive tests; drug treatment; impact of drug use by parents on children; confidentiality; exceptions.

As used in this Code section, the term “established drug test” means the collection and testing of bodily fluids administered in a manner equivalent to that required by the Mandatory Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services or other professionally valid procedures approved by the department; provided, however, that where possible and practicable, a swab test shall be used in lieu of a urinalysis.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations for an established drug test which shall include the following:

Which illegal drugs will be the subject of testing;

Methods for assuring minimal privacy intrusions during collection of body fluid specimens for such testing;

Methods for assuring proper storage, transportation, and handling of such specimens in order to ensure the integrity of the testing process;

The identity of those persons entitled to the results of such tests and methods for ensuring that only authorized persons are given access to such results;

A list of laboratories qualified to conduct established drug tests;

A list of approved substance abuse treatment providers;

Procedures for persons undergoing drug testing, prior to the collection of body fluid specimens for such testing, to provide information regarding use of any drug pursuant to a medical prescription or as otherwise authorized by law which may affect the results of such test; and

A requirement that any applicant who demonstrates proof of active and current Medicaid benefits shall pay a drug screening application fee of no more than $17.00, and no authorized test examiner shall conduct a drug test if an applicant demonstrates active and current Medicaid benefits unless the applicant presents a receipt proving that he or she has paid the required drug screening application fee. Eligible applicants who do not have active and current Medicaid benefits shall be responsible for paying the full cost of administering the drug test upon presentation to an authorized examiner.

The department shall require a drug test consistent with subsection (b) of this Code section to screen an applicant or recipient at any time a reasonable suspicion exists that such applicant or recipient is using an illegal drug. The department may use any information obtained by the department to determine whether such reasonable suspicion exists, including, but not limited to:

An applicant’s or recipient’s demeanor;

Missed appointments and arrest or other police records;

Previous employment or application for employment in an occupation or industry that regularly conducts drug screening; and

Termination from previous employment due to unlawful use of a controlled substance or controlled substance analog or prior drug screening records of the applicant or recipient indicating unlawful use of a controlled substance or controlled substance analog.

The cost of drug testing shall be the responsibility of the individual tested, provided that the individual does not submit proof of active and current Medicaid benefits to subsidize the cost of such drug testing pursuant to paragraph (8) of subsection (b) of this Code section. No assistance payment shall be delayed because of the requirements of this Code section, and any payments made prior to the department’s receipt of a test result showing a failure shall be recoverable.

Any recipient of cash assistance under this article who tests positive for controlled substances as a result of a drug test required under this Code section shall be ineligible to receive TANF benefits as follows:

For a first positive result, the recipient shall be ineligible for TANF benefits for one month and until he or she tests negative in a retest;

For a second positive result, the recipient shall be ineligible for TANF benefits for three months and until he or she tests negative in a retest; and

For a third and each subsequent positive result, the recipient shall be ineligible for TANF benefits for one year and until he or she tests negative in a retest unless the individual meets the requirements of subsection (f) of this Code section.

The department shall:

Provide notice of possible drug testing based on reasonable suspicion to each individual at the time of application. Dependent children under the age of 18 are exempt from the drug testing requirement;

Advise each individual to be tested, before the test is conducted, that he or she may, but is not required to, advise the agent administering the test of any prescription or over the counter medication he or she is taking;

Require each individual to be tested to sign a written acknowledgment that he or she has received and understood the notice and advice provided under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection;

Assure each individual being tested a reasonable degree of dignity while producing and submitting a sample for drug testing, consistent with the state’s need to ensure the reliability of the sample;

Specify circumstances under which an individual who fails a drug test has the right to take one or more additional tests;

Inform an individual who tests positive for a controlled substance and is deemed ineligible for TANF benefits for one year pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (d) of this Code section that the individual may reapply for those benefits six months after the date of the positive drug test if he or she meets the requirements of subsection (f) of this Code section; and

Provide any individual who tests positive with a list of substance abuse treatment providers approved by the department which are available in the area in which he or she resides. Neither the department nor the state shall be responsible for providing or paying for substance abuse treatment.

An individual who tests positive for an illegal drug and is denied TANF benefits for one year may reapply for TANF benefits after six months if the individual can document the successful completion of a substance abuse treatment program offered by a provider approved by the department. The cost of any drug testing provided under this Code section and substance abuse treatment shall be the responsibility of the individual being tested and receiving treatment. An individual who fails the drug test required under subsection (c) of this Code section may reapply for TANF benefits under this subsection only once.

If a parent is deemed ineligible for TANF benefits as a result of failing a drug test conducted under this Code section:

The dependent child’s eligibility for TANF benefits shall not be affected;

An appropriate protective payee shall be designated to receive benefits on behalf of the child; and

The parent may choose to designate another individual to receive benefits for the parent’s minor child. The designated individual must be an immediate family member or, if an immediate family member is not available or the family member declines the option, another individual approved by the department. The designated individual shall be subject to possible drug testing based on a reasonable suspicion. If the designated individual tests positive for controlled substances, he or she shall be ineligible to receive benefits on behalf of the child.

The results of any drug test done according to this Code section shall not be subject to disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to inspection of public records. Such results shall not be used as a part of a criminal investigation or criminal prosecution. Such results shall not be used in a civil action or otherwise disclosed to any person or entity without the express written consent of the person tested or his or her heirs or legal representative. All such records shall be destroyed and deleted five years after the date of the test.

No testing shall be required by the provisions of this Code section for any person whom the department determines is significantly hindered, because of a physical or mental handicap or developmental disability, from doing so or for any person enrolled in an enhanced primary care case management program operated by the Department of Community Health, Division of Medical Assistance to serve frail elderly and disabled beneficiaries to improve the health outcomes of persons with chronic health conditions by linking primary medical care with home and community based services. In addition, no testing shall be required by the provisions of this Code section for any individuals receiving or on a waiting list for long-term services and supports through a non-Medicaid home and community based services program or for any individual residing in a facility such as a nursing home, personal care home, assisted living community, intermediate care facility for the intellectually or developmentally disabled, community living arrangement, or host home.

The department shall adopt rules to implement this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-193

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 91, § 3/HB 861; Ga. L. 2014, p. 844, § 2/HB 772; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 49/SB 340; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 4-13/HB 252.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012.

The 2014 amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services” for “(53 C.F.R. 11979, et seq., as amended)” in the middle of subsection (a); rewrote subsections (b), (c), and (e); deleted the former second and third sentences of subsection (f), which read: “An individual who has met the requirements of this subsection and reapplies for TANF benefits shall also pass an initial drug test and meet the requirements of subsection (c) of this Code section. Any drug test conducted while the individual is undergoing substance abuse treatment shall meet the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section.”; and substituted “shall be subject to possible drug testing based on a reasonable suspicion” for “shall also undergo drug testing before being approved to receive benefits on behalf of the child” in the third sentence of paragraph (g)(3). The second 2014 amendment, effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Mandatory Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs” for “Mandatory Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs (53 C.F.R. 11979, et seq., as amended)” in subsection (a).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “intellectually or developmentally disabled” for “mentally retarded” in subsection (i).

Cross references.

Drug-free workplace programs, T. 34, C. 9, A. 11.

Random drug testing of employees in high risk jobs, T. 45, C. 20, A. 5.

Drug testing for state employment, T. 45, C. 20, A. 6.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 91, § 1/HB 861, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Social Responsibility and Accountability Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2012, p. 91, § 2/HB 861, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to:

“(1) Ensure that TANF funds are ultimately utilized for the intended purpose of alleviating the effects of poverty and are not diverted to illicit drug use;

“(2) Protect children of poverty by ensuring such funds strengthen family life and reduce the danger that illicit drugs will be introduced into the home environment;

“(3) Assist adults addicted to drugs to avoid the temptation and restructure their lives by focusing on employment and becoming better parents; and

“(4) Ensure that the government does not subsidize the public health risk posed by drug use and the associated criminal activities.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 224 (2012).

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 205 (2014).